Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0520.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 462f. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who violates section 462b, 462c, or 462d is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 20 years or and a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both.$20,000.00. (b) If the violation results in bodily injury to an individual or results in an individual being engaged in commercial sexual activity, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (c) If the violation results in serious bodily injury to an individual, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (b) (d) If the violation involves kidnapping or attempted kidnapping, criminal sexual conduct in the first degree or attempted criminal sexual conduct in the first degree, or an attempt to kill or the death of an individual, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years or and a fine of not more than $50,000.00. , or both. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who violates section 462e is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years life or any term of years and a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both.$50,000.00. (3) A person who attempts, conspires, or solicits another to violate this chapter is subject to the same penalty as a person who commits a violation of this chapter. (4) This section does not prohibit a person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (5) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed for violating this section to be served consecutively to a term of imprisonment imposed for the commission of any other crime, including any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (6) In addition to any mandatory restitution applicable under section 16 of the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.766, the court may order a person convicted of violating this section to pay restitution to the victim in the manner provided in section 16b of the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.766b, and to reimburse any governmental entity for its expenses incurred in relation to the violation in the same manner that expenses may be ordered to be reimbursed under section 1f of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.1f. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.